Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-3001
Terms, defined.

For purposes of sections 25-3001 to 25-3004:

(1) Eligible low-income person means any person (a) whose income is less than one hundred twenty-five percent of the federal poverty level, (b) who is financially eligible under the service provider's eligibility guidelines, (c) who resides in one of the counties in the service provider's area, and (d) who has a civil legal problem that falls within the guidelines established by the Commission on Public Advocacy;

(2) Service area means the counties in Nebraska defined by the commission as the area to be served by a service provider; and

(3) Service provider means a nonprofit entity that is engaged in or desires to become engaged in the provision of free civil legal services to eligible low-income persons.

Laws 1997, LB 729, § 4.